Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,135
Inmate; right to file grievance; procedure.

An inmate shall have the right to file a grievance on any subject except disciplinary actions and matters over which the Department of Correctional Services has no control. Grievance procedures shall provide for the review of grievances by a person or persons other than the person or persons directly responsible for the conditions or actions against which the grievance is filed.

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 60.